North Dakota, session 69, HB1476.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
School buildings - Assessment - Rules.
The superintendent of public instruction:
1. May collect regularly conducted assessments by school districts of each building located on
school grounds in the state, including the interior and exterior of the building, doors, windows,
fire sprinklers , fire protection systems, components of heating, cooling, plumbing, electrical ,
and security systems, and handicap accessibility features.
2. May, every four years, document the inventory of buildings, including building type, original
construction year, facility additions, facility addition construction year, and facility square
footage as submitted by school districts.
3. May develop and maintain a system for tracking the assessments of buildings, including
construction, repairs, modifications, and maintenance recommended for each school.
4. Shall adopt rules under chapter 28 - 32 to implement this section .
5. May contract for professional services to implement this section, including contracting to study
appropriate criteria to establish for public school facility standards.

H. B. NO. 1476 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1476.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 28 Nays 19 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State